New York, session 2025-2026, A7168.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 8-100 of the election law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 5 to read as follows: 3 5. (a) No court shall issue an order changing the date of a primary 4 election which bifurcates the offices and positions to be elected and 5 nominations to be made as part of the same primary election pursuant to 6 paragraph (a) of subdivision one of this section. 7 (b) The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to any presi- 8 dential primary. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10996-01-5